Hawaii statutes.
§372-1 Application of chapter. This
chapter shall apply to a person, employer, association, committee, or
organization only after such person, employer, association, committee, or
organization has voluntarily elected to conform with its provisions. [L Sp
1941, c 23, §6; RL 1945, §4147; RL 1955, §89-1; HRS §372-1; am L 2012, c 14, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next